Utah statutes.
26-8a-503.   Discipline of emergency medical services personnel.

(1)  The department may refuse to issue a certificate or renewal, or revoke, suspend, restrict, or place on probation an individual's certificate if:

(a)  the individual does not meet the qualifications for certification under Section 26-8a-302;

(b)  the individual has engaged in conduct, as defined by committee rule, that:

(i)  is unprofessional;

(ii)  is adverse to the public health, safety, morals, or welfare; or

(iii)  would adversely affect public trust in the emergency medical service system;

(c)  the individual has violated Section 26-8a-502 or other provision of this chapter;

(d)  a court of competent jurisdiction has determined the individual to be mentally incompetent for any reason; or

(e)  the individual is unable to provide emergency medical services with reasonable skill and safety because of illness, drunkenness, use of drugs, narcotics, chemicals, or any other type of material, or as a result of any other mental or physical condition, when the individual's condition demonstrates a clear and unjustifiable threat or potential threat to oneself, coworkers, or the public health, safety, or welfare that cannot be reasonably mitigated.

(2) (a)  An action to revoke, suspend, restrict, or place a certificate on probation shall be done in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act.

(b)  Notwithstanding Subsection (2)(a), the department may issue a cease and desist order under Section 26-8a-507 to immediately suspend an individual's certificate pending an administrative proceeding to be held within 30 days if there is evidence to show that the individual poses a clear, immediate, and unjustifiable threat or potential threat to the public health, safety, or welfare.

(3)  An individual whose certificate has been suspended, revoked, or restricted may apply for reinstatement of the certificate at reasonable intervals and upon compliance with any conditions imposed upon the certificate by statute, committee rule, or the terms of the suspension, revocation, or restriction.

(4)  In addition to taking disciplinary action under Subsection (1), the department may impose sanctions in accordance with Section 26-23-6.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

